Illinois, session 104th, HB3937.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated from the General 8Revenue Fund to the Governor's Office of Management and 9Budget: 10  For all costs and administrative expenses associated with11   implementing, monitoring and reporting State agency12   expenditures of funds received from the federal government,13   including funds made available under the American Rescue14   Plan Act or any other federal act..................550,00015  For all costs and administrative expenses associated with16   financial audits, internal controls, and reporting of the17   State's financial statements.......................550,00018  For operational expenses of the Budgeting for19   Results Initiative.................................400,00020  For Operational Expenses..........................3,300,00021    Total                                          $4,800,000 22  HB3937- 2 -OMB104 00057 LMM 10057 b1    Section 10. The amount of $1,400,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Capital 3Development Fund to the Governor's Office of Management and 4Budget for ordinary and contingent expenses associated with 5the sale and administration of General Obligation Bonds. 6    Section 15. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Grant 8Accountability and Transparency Fund to the Governor's Office 9of Management and Budget for costs in support of the 10implementation and administration of the Grant Accountability 11and Transparency Act and the Budgeting for Results initiative. 12    Section 20. The sum of $113,400, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from the School Infrastructure 14Fund to the Governor's Office of Management and Budget for 15operational expenses related to the School Infrastructure 16Program. 17    Section 25. The amount of $633,300,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build Illinois 19Bond Retirement and Interest Fund to the Governor's Office of 20Management and Budget for the purpose of making payments to 21the Trustee under the Master Indenture as defined by and 22pursuant to the Build Illinois Bond Act.   HB3937- 3 -OMB104 00057 LMM 10057 b1    Section 30. The amount of $650,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build Illinois Bond 3Fund to the Governor's Office of Management and Budget for 4ordinary and contingent expenses associated with the sale and 5administration of Build Illinois bonds. 6    Section 35. No contract shall be entered into or 7obligation incurred for any expenditures from the 8appropriations made in Sections 10, 25 and 30 until after the 9purposes and amounts have been approved in writing by the 10Governor. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122025.